Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2171.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 36-4-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 36-4 entitled "Merit System"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
36-4-9. Adoption of classification plan.
(a) The personnel administrator shall, after consultation with appointing authorities and
principal supervising officials, classify all of the positions in the classified service according to the
duties and responsibilities of each position. The plan of classification shall designate an appropriate
title for each class of position and shall indicate the education, experience, capacity, knowledge,
skill, and other qualifications to be required of persons appointed to positions in each class. The
complete classification plan shall be so arranged that all positions that are substantially similar with
respect to authority, responsibility, and character of work are included within the same class and
that the same pay schedules can be made to apply with equity under like working conditions. The
class titles so established shall be used in all personnel, accounting, budget, appropriation, and
financial records of all state departments, commissions, and institutions.
(b) The office of personnel administration ("OPA") classification guide to desk audit
analysis and class specification development shall be amended to remove the supervision of other
employees, or lack thereof, as a requirement for classification upgrades through the desk audit
process.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003982
========
LC003982 - Page 2 of 3